District of Columbia statutes.
29-702.05

Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

(a)

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the Mayor for filing does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the Superior Court to order:

(1)

The person to sign the record;

(2)

Deliver the record to the Mayor for filing; or

(3)

The Mayor to file the record unsigned.

(b)

If the person aggrieved under subsection (a) of this section is not the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to which the record pertains, the aggrieved person shall make the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership a party to the action. A person aggrieved under subsection (a) of this section may seek the remedies provided in subsection (a) of this section in the same action in combination or in the alternative.

(c)

A record filed unsigned pursuant to this section shall be effective without being signed.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-702.06.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 205 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).